Washington statutes.
RCW 18.155.075

Affiliate certificate—Requirements.

(1) The department shall issue an affiliate certificate to any applicant who meets the following requirements:

(a) Successful completion of an educational program approved by the secretary or successful completion of alternate training which meets the criteria of the secretary;

(b) Successful completion of an examination administered or approved by the secretary;

(c) Proof of supervision by a qualified supervisor;

(d) Not having engaged in unprofessional conduct or being unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety as a result of a physical or mental impairment;

(e) Not convicted of a sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or convicted in any other jurisdiction of an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and

(f) Other requirements as may be established by the secretary that impact the competence of the sex offender treatment provider.

(2) Individuals credentialed by the department of health as a certified affiliate sex offender treatment provider prior to June 11, 2020, are considered to have met the requirement of holding an underlying health license or credential described in RCW 18.155.020(3), provided the underlying license or credential remains active and in good standing.

[ 2020 c 266 s 3; 2006 c 134 s 2; 2004 c 38 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 38: "This act takes effect July 1, 2004." [ 2004 c 38 s 15.]